Washington statutes.
RCW 16.24.100

Prosecution—Proof of ownership.

In any prosecution under chapter 16.24 RCW proof that the animal running at large is branded with the registered or known brand of the defendant shall be prima facie evidence that the defendant is the owner of said animal.

[ 1989 c 286 s 3; 1895 c 124 s 2; RRS s 3086. Formerly RCW 16.16.020.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 286: See note following RCW 16.04.010.